Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-832
Inspection warrant; when issued.

Inspection warrants shall be issued only upon showing that consent to entry for inspection purposes has been refused. In emergency situations neither consent nor a warrant shall be required.

Laws 1969, c. 231, § 3, p. 859.

A defendant who seeks to suppress evidence obtained under an inspection warrant has the burden of establishing that the warrant is invalid so that evidence secured thereby may be suppressed. State v. Anderson, 317 Neb. 435, 10 N.W.3d 334 (2024).

The constitutional validity of an inspection warrant is not affected by a violation of this statute. State v. Anderson, 317 Neb. 435, 10 N.W.3d 334 (2024).

The failure to comply with the prior refusal requirement in this statute does not affect a substantial right that requires suppression of evidence. State v. Anderson, 317 Neb. 435, 10 N.W.3d 334 (2024).